Utah statutes.
57-1-27.   Sale of trust property by public auction -- Postponement of sale.

(1) (a)  On the date and at the time and place designated in the notice of sale, the trustee or the attorney for the trustee shall sell the property at public auction to the highest bidder.  The trustee, or the attorney for the trustee, may conduct the sale and act as the auctioneer.  The trustor, or the trustor's successor in interest, if present at the sale, may direct the order in which the trust property shall be sold, if the property consists of several known lots or parcels which can be sold separately.  The trustee or attorney for the trustee shall follow these directions.  Any person, including the beneficiary or trustee, may bid at the sale.  The trustee may bid for the beneficiary.  Each bid is considered an irrevocable offer.  If the highest bidder refuses to pay the amount bid by the highest bidder for the property, the trustee, or the attorney for the trustee, shall either:

(i)  renotice the sale in the same manner as notice of the original sale is required to be given; or

(ii)  sell the property to the next highest bidder.

(b)  A bidder refusing to pay the bid price is liable for any loss occasioned by the refusal, including interest, costs, and trustee's and reasonable attorneys' fees. The trustee or the attorney for the trustee may thereafter reject any other bid of that person for the property.

(2)  The person conducting the sale may, for any cause he considers expedient, postpone the sale. The person conducting the sale shall give notice of each postponement by public declaration, by written notice or oral postponement, at the time and place last appointed for the sale.  No other notice of the postponed sale is required, unless the postponement exceeds 45 days.  In that event, the sale shall be renoticed in the same manner as the original notice of sale is required to be given.



Amended by Chapter 236, 2001 General Session

